Utah statutes.
35A-8-1801.   Transitional Housing and Community Development Advisory Council -- Membership -- Duties.

(1)  There is created the Transitional Housing and Community Development Advisory Council within the Department of Workforce Services consisting of the following members:

(a)  the executive director of the Department of Workforce Services or the executive director's designee, who shall serve as chair of the advisory council;

(b)  the director of the Housing and Community Development Division of the Department of Workforce Services;

(c)  a representative from the governor's office designated and appointed by the governor;

(d)  two representatives of entities that use or allocate funds distributed by the Housing and Community Development Division, designated and appointed by the director of the Housing and Community Development Division; and

(e)  the executive director, or the executive director's designee, of the:

(i)  Bear River Association of Governments;

(ii)  Five County Association of Governments;

(iii)  Mountainland Association of Governments;

(iv)  Six County Association of Governments;

(v)  Southeastern Utah Association of Governments;

(vi)  Uintah Basin Association of Governments;

(vii)  Wasatch Front Regional Council;

(viii)  Community Action Partnership of Utah;

(ix)  Salt Lake Community Action Program; and

(x)  Utah Housing Coalition.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the advisory council shall meet at least once every three months and may meet more frequently as needed.

(b)  The advisory council may meet less than once every three months if the chair, after polling the members, determines that a meeting is not needed.

(c)  The chair, or a majority of the advisory council, may call a meeting of the advisory council.

(d)  A majority of the membership is a quorum for conducting advisory council business and a majority vote of the quorum present is required for an action to be taken by the advisory council.

(e)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(i)  Section 63A-3-106;

(ii)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(iii)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(f)  The Housing and Community Development Division shall provide necessary administrative and staff support services to the advisory council.

(3)  The advisory council shall advise and counsel the Department of Workforce Services and the department's Housing and Community Development Division in formulating rules, protocols, and policies to:

(a)  successfully transition the division from the Department of Community and Culture;

(b)  maintain consistency in providing services to, and cooperating with, qualifying interested parties, including individuals, groups, political subdivisions, and community action agencies, which properly participated in division services under the Department of Community and Culture; and

(c)  inform and advise interested parties, including individuals, groups, political subdivisions, and community action agencies regarding:

(i)  the division's transition to the Department of Workforce Services; and

(ii)  each significant change, or contemplated change, in the delivery of division services.

(4)  The Housing and Community Development Division shall present to the advisory council for its advice and counsel, each significant proposed change to the delivery of services by the division.

